Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.420

Notice of lease to be published before execution.

No lease of a portion of the end of a street terminating in the waterfront or navigable waters of the city shall be made until a notice describing the portion of the street proposed to be leased, to whom and for what purpose leased and the proposed rental to be paid has been published by the city clerk in the official newspaper at least fifteen days prior to the execution of the lease.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.420. Prior: 1907 c 241 s 67, part; RRS s 9070, part.]